Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 3. Registration Of Securities And Notice Filing Of Federal Covered
Securities

§ 17-4-301.
Securities
registration requirement.

It is unlawful for a person to offer or sell a security in this state unless:

The security is a federal covered security;

The security, transaction, or offer is exempted from registration under W.S.

17-4-201

through

17-4-204

; or

The security is registered under this act.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-302.
Notice filing.

With respect to a federal covered security, as defined in section 18(b)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77r(b)(2)), that is not otherwise exempt under W.S.

17-4-201

through

17-4-204

, a rule adopted or order issued under this act may require the filing of any or all of the following records:

Before the initial offer of a federal covered security in this state, all records that are part of a federal registration statement filed with the securities and exchange commission under the Securities Act of 1933 and a consent to service of process complying with W.S.

17-4-611

signed by the issuer and the payment of a fee of two hundred dollars ($200.00);

After the initial offer of the federal covered security in this state, all records that are part of an amendment to a federal registration statement filed with the securities and exchange commission under the Securities Act of 1933; and

To the extent necessary or appropriate to compute fees, a report of the value of the federal covered securities sold or offered to persons present in this state, if the sales data are not included in records filed with the securities and exchange commission and payment of a fee as set by rule.

A notice filing under subsection (a) of this section is effective for two (2) years commencing on the later of the notice filing or the effectiveness of the offering filed with the securities and exchange commission. On or before expiration, the issuer may renew a notice filing by filing a copy of those records filed by the issuer with the securities and exchange commission that are required by rule or order under this act to be filed and by paying a renewal fee as set by rule. A previously filed consent to service of process complying with W.S.

17-4-611

may be incorporated by reference in a renewal. A renewed notice filing becomes effective upon the expiration of the filing being renewed.

With respect to a security that is a federal covered security under section 18(b)(4)(D) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77r(b)(4)(D)), a rule under this act may require a notice filing by or on behalf of an issuer to include a copy of Form D, including the appendix, as promulgated by the securities and exchange commission, and a consent to service of process complying with W.S.

17-4-611

signed by the issuer not later than fifteen (15) days after the first sale of the federal covered security in this state and the payment of a fee as set by rule; and the payment of a fee for any late filing as set by rule.

Except with respect to a federal security under section 18(b)(1) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77r(b)(1)), if the secretary of state finds that there is a failure to comply with a notice or fee requirement of this section, the secretary of state may issue a stop order suspending the offer and sale of a federal covered security in this state. If the deficiency is corrected, the stop order is void as of the time of its issuance and no penalty may be imposed by the secretary of state.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-303.
Securities
registration by coordination.

A security for which a registration statement has been filed under the Securities Act of 1933 in connection with the same offering may be registered by coordination under this section.

A registration statement and accompanying records under this section must contain or be accompanied by the following records in addition to the information specified in W.S.

17-4-305

and a consent to service of process complying with W.S.

17-4-611

:

A copy of the latest form of prospectus filed under the Securities Act of 1933;

A copy of the articles of incorporation and bylaws or their substantial equivalents currently in effect; a copy of any agreement with or among underwriters; a copy of any indenture or other instrument governing the issuance of the security to be registered; and a specimen, copy, or description of the security that is required by rule adopted or order issued under this act;

Copies of any other information or any other records filed by the issuer under the Securities Act of 1933 requested by the secretary of state; and

An undertaking to forward each amendment to the federal prospectus, other than an amendment that delays the effective date of the registration statement, promptly after it is filed with the securities and exchange commission.

A registration statement under this section becomes effective simultaneously with or subsequent to the federal registration statement when all the following conditions are satisfied:

A stop order under subsection (d) of this section or W.S.

17-4-306

or issued by the securities and exchange commission is not in effect and a proceeding is not pending against the issuer under W.S.

17-4-306

; and

The registration statement has been on file for at least twenty (20) days or a shorter period provided by rule adopted or order issued under this act.

The registrant shall promptly notify the secretary of state in a record of the date when the federal registration statement becomes effective and the content of any price amendment and shall promptly file a record containing the price amendment. If the notice is not timely received, the secretary of state may issue a stop order, without prior notice or hearing, retroactively denying effectiveness to the registration statement or suspending its effectiveness until compliance with this section. The secretary of state shall promptly notify the registrant of an order by telegram, telephone, or electronic means and promptly confirm this notice by a record. If the registrant subsequently complies with the notice requirements of this section, the stop order is void as of the date of its issuance.

If the federal registration statement becomes effective before each of the conditions in this section is satisfied or is waived by the secretary of state, the registration statement is automatically effective under this act when all the conditions are satisfied or waived. If the registrant notifies the secretary of state of the date when the federal registration statement is expected to become effective, the secretary of state shall promptly notify the registrant by telegram, telephone, or electronic means and promptly confirm this notice by a record, indicating whether all the conditions are satisfied or waived and whether the secretary of state intends the institution of a proceeding under W.S.

17-4-306

. The notice by the secretary of state does not preclude the institution of such a proceeding.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-304.
Securities
registration by qualification.

A security may be registered by qualification under this section.

A registration statement under this section must contain the information or records specified in W.S.

17-4-305

, a consent to service of process complying with W.S.

17-4-611

, and, if required by rule adopted under this act, the following information or records:

With respect to the issuer and any significant subsidiary, its name, address, and form of organization; the state or foreign jurisdiction and date of its organization; the general character and location of its business; a description of its physical properties and equipment; and a statement of the general competitive conditions in the industry or business in which it is or will be engaged;

With respect to each director and officer of the issuer, and other person having a similar status or performing similar functions, the person’s name, address, and principal occupation for the previous five (5) years; the amount of securities of the issuer held by the person as of the thirtieth day before the filing of the registration statement; the amount of the securities covered by the registration statement to which the person has indicated an intention to subscribe; and a description of any material interest of the person in any material transaction with the issuer or a significant subsidiary effected within the previous three (3) years or proposed to be effected;

With respect to persons covered by paragraph (ii) of this subsection, the aggregate sum of the remuneration paid to those persons during the previous twelve (12) months and estimated to be paid during the next twelve (12) months, directly or indirectly, by the issuer, and all predecessors, parents, subsidiaries, and affiliates of the issuer;

With respect to a person owning of record or owning beneficially, if known, ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding shares of any class of equity security of the issuer, the information specified in paragraph (ii) of this subsection other than the person’s occupation;

With respect to a promoter, if the issuer was organized within the previous three (3) years, the information or records specified in paragraph (ii) of this subsection, any amount paid to the promoter within that period or intended to be paid to the promoter, and the consideration for the payment;

With respect to a person on whose behalf any part of the offering is to be made in a nonissuer distribution, the person’s name and address; the amount of securities of the issuer held by the person as of the date of the filing of the registration statement; a description of any material interest of the person in any material transaction with the issuer or any significant subsidiary effected within the previous three (3) years or proposed to be effected; and a statement of the reasons for making the offering;

The capitalization and long term debt, on both a current and pro forma basis, of the issuer and any significant subsidiary, including a description of each security outstanding or being registered or otherwise offered, and a statement of the amount and kind of consideration, whether in the form of cash, physical assets, services, patents, goodwill, or anything else of value, for which the issuer or any subsidiary has issued its securities within the previous two (2) years or is obligated to issue its securities;

The kind and amount of securities to be offered; the proposed offering price or the method by which it is to be computed; any variation at which a proportion of the offering is to be made to a person or class of persons other than the underwriters, with a specification of the person or class; the basis on which the offering is to be made if otherwise than for cash; the estimated aggregate underwriting and selling discounts or commissions and finders’ fees, including separately cash, securities, contracts, or anything else of value to accrue to the underwriters or finders in connection with the offering or, if the selling discounts or commissions are variable, the basis of determining them and their maximum and minimum amounts; the estimated amounts of other selling expenses, including legal, engineering, and accounting charges; the name and address of each underwriter and each recipient of a finder’s fee; a copy of any underwriting or selling group agreement under which the distribution is to be made or the proposed form of any such agreement whose terms have not yet been determined; and a description of the plan of distribution of any securities that are to be offered otherwise than through an underwriter;

The estimated monetary proceeds to be received by the issuer from the offering; the purposes for which the proceeds are to be used by the issuer; the estimated amount to be used for each purpose; the order or priority in which the proceeds will be used for the purposes stated; the amounts of any funds to be raised from other sources to achieve the purposes stated; the sources of the funds; and, if a part of the proceeds is to be used to acquire property, including goodwill, otherwise than in the ordinary course of business, the names and addresses of the vendors, the purchase price, the names of any persons that have received commissions in connection with the acquisition, and the amounts of the commissions and other expenses in connection with the acquisition, including the cost of borrowing money to finance the acquisition;

A description of any stock options or other security options outstanding, or to be created in connection with the offering, and the amount of those options held or to be held by each person required to be named in paragraph (ii), (iv), (v), (vi), or (viii) of this subsection and by any person that holds or will hold ten percent (10%) or more in the aggregate of those options;

The dates of, parties to, and general effect concisely stated of each managerial or other material contract made or to be made otherwise than in the ordinary course of business to be performed in whole or in part at or after the filing of the registration statement or that was made within the previous two (2) years, and a copy of the contract;

A description of any pending litigation, action, or proceeding to which the issuer is a party and that materially affects its business or assets, and any litigation, action, or proceeding known to be contemplated by governmental authorities;

A copy of any prospectus, pamphlet, circular, form letter, advertisement, or other sales literature intended as of the effective date to be used in connection with the offering and any solicitation of interest used in compliance with W.S. 17-4-202(a)(xvii)(B);

A specimen or copy of the security being registered, unless the security is uncertificated; a copy of the issuer’s articles of incorporation and bylaws or their substantial equivalents, in effect; and a copy of any indenture or other instrument covering the security to be registered;

A signed or conformed copy of an opinion of counsel concerning the legality of the security being registered, with an English translation if it is in a language other than English, which states whether the security when sold will be validly issued, fully paid, and nonassessable and, if a debt security, a binding obligation of the issuer;

A signed or conformed copy of a consent of any accountant, engineer, appraiser, or other person whose profession gives authority for a statement made by the person, if the person is named as having prepared or certified a report or valuation, other than an official record, that is public, which is used in connection with the registration statement;

A balance sheet of the issuer as of a date within four (4) months before the filing of the registration statement; a statement of income and a statement of cash flows for each of the three (3) fiscal years preceding the date of the balance sheet and for any period between the close of the immediately previous fiscal year and the date of the balance sheet, or for the period of the issuer’s and any predecessor’s existence if less than three (3) years; and, if any part of the proceeds of the offering is to be applied to the purchase of a business, the financial statements that would be required if that business were the registrant; and

Any additional information or records required by rule adopted or order issued under this act.

A registration statement under this section becomes effective when the secretary of state so orders.

A rule adopted or order issued under this act may require as a condition of registration under this section that a prospectus containing a specified part of the information or record specified in subsection (b) of this section be sent or given to each person to which an offer is made, before or concurrently, with the earliest of:

The first offer made in a record to the person otherwise than by means of a public advertisement, by or for the account of the issuer or another person on whose behalf the offering is being made or by an underwriter or broker-dealer that is offering part of an unsold allotment or subscription taken by the person as a participant in the distribution;

The confirmation of a sale made by or for the account of the person;

Payment pursuant to such a sale; or

Delivery of the security pursuant to such a sale.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-305.
Securities
registration filings.

A registration statement may be filed by the issuer, a person on whose behalf the offering is to be made, or a broker-dealer registered under this act.

A person filing a registration statement shall pay a filing fee of one-fiftieth of one percent (.0002) of the total dollar offering amount to be offered in this state, but the fee shall in no case be less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) nor more than six hundred dollars ($600.00) when filing an initial registration statement or renewing a previously filed registration statement. If a registration statement is withdrawn before the effective date or a preeffective stop order is issued under W.S.

17-4-306

the secretary of state shall retain one hundred dollars ($100.00) of the fee.

A registration statement filed under W.S.

17-4-303

or

17-4-304

must specify:

The amount of securities to be offered in this state;

The states in which a registration statement or similar record in connection with the offering has been or is to be filed; and

Any adverse order, judgment, or decree issued in connection with the offering by a state securities regulator, the securities and exchange commission, or a court.

A record filed under this act or the predecessor act within five (5) years preceding the filing of a registration statement may be incorporated by reference in the registration statement to the extent that the record is currently accurate.

In the case of a nonissuer distribution, information or a record may not be required under subsection (j) of this section or W.S.

17-4-304

, unless it is known to the person filing the registration statement or to the person on whose behalf the distribution is to be made or unless it can be furnished by those persons without unreasonable effort or expense.

A rule adopted or order issued under this act may require as a condition of registration that a security issued within the previous five (5) years or to be issued to a promoter for a consideration substantially less than the public offering price or to a person for a consideration other than cash be deposited in escrow; and that the proceeds from the sale of the registered security in this state be impounded until the issuer receives a specified amount from the sale of the security either in this state or elsewhere. The conditions of any escrow or impoundment required under this subsection may be established by rule adopted or order issued under this act, but the secretary of state may not reject a depository institution solely because of its location in another state.

A rule adopted or order issued under this act may require as a condition of registration that a security registered under this act be sold only on a specified form of subscription or sale contract and that a signed or conformed copy of each contract be filed under this act or preserved for a period specified by the rule or order, which may not be longer than five (5) years.

Except while a stop order is in effect under W.S.

17-4-306

, a registration statement is effective for one (1) year after its effective date, or for any longer period designated in an order under this act during which the security is being offered or distributed in a nonexempted transaction by or for the account of the issuer or other person on whose behalf the offering is being made or by an underwriter or broker-dealer that is still offering part of an unsold allotment or subscription taken as a participant in the distribution. For the purposes of a nonissuer transaction, all outstanding securities of the same class identified in the registration statement as a security registered under this act are considered to be registered while the registration statement is effective. If any securities of the same class are outstanding, a registration statement may not be withdrawn until one (1) year after its effective date. A registration statement may be withdrawn only with the approval of the secretary of state.

While a registration statement is effective, a rule adopted or order issued under this act may require the person that filed the registration statement to file reports, not more often than quarterly, to keep the information or other record in the registration statement reasonably current and to disclose the progress of the offering.

A registration statement may be amended after its effective date. The post effective amendment becomes effective when the secretary of state so orders. If a post effective amendment is made to increase the number of securities specified to be offered or sold, the person filing the amendment shall pay a registration fee specified in subsection (b) of this section. A post effective amendment relates back to the date of the offering of the additional securities being registered if, within one (1) year after the date of the sale, the amendment is filed and the additional registration fee is paid.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-306.
Denial,
suspension, and revocation of securities registration.

The secretary of state may issue a stop order denying effectiveness to, or suspending or revoking the effectiveness of, a registration statement if the secretary of state finds that the order is in the public interest and that:

The registration statement as of its effective date or before the effective date in the case of an order denying effectiveness, an amendment under W.S. 17-4-305(k) as of its effective date, or a report under W.S. 17-4-305(j), is incomplete in a material respect or contains a statement that, in the light of the circumstances under which it was made, was false or misleading with respect to a material fact;

This act or a rule adopted or order issued under this act or a condition imposed under this act has been willfully violated, in connection with the offering, by the person filing the registration statement; by the issuer, a partner, officer, or director of the issuer or a person having a similar status or performing a similar function; a promoter of the issuer; or a person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by the issuer; but only if the person filing the registration statement is directly or indirectly controlled by or acting for the issuer; or by an underwriter;

The security registered or sought to be registered is the subject of a permanent or temporary injunction of a court of competent jurisdiction or an administrative stop order or similar order issued under any federal, foreign, or state law other than this act applicable to the offering, but the secretary of state may not institute a proceeding against an effective registration statement under this paragraph more than one (1) year after the date of the order or injunction on which it is based, and the secretary of state may not issue an order under this paragraph on the basis of an order or injunction issued under the securities act of another state unless the order or injunction was based on conduct that would constitute, as of the date of the order, a ground for a stop order under this section;

The issuer’s enterprise or method of business includes or would include activities that are unlawful where performed;

With respect to a security sought to be registered under W.S.

17-4-303

, there has been a failure to comply with the undertaking required by W.S.

17-4-303

(b)(iv);

The applicant or registrant has not paid the filing fee, but the secretary of state shall void the order if the deficiency is corrected; or

The offering:

Will work or tend to work a fraud upon purchasers or would so operate;

Has been or would be made with unreasonable amounts of underwriters’ and sellers’ discounts, commissions, or other compensation, or promoters’ profits or participations, or unreasonable amounts or kinds of options; or

Is being made on terms that are unfair, unjust, or inequitable.

To the extent practicable, the secretary of state by rule adopted or order issued under this act shall publish standards that provide notice of conduct that violates paragraph (a)(vii) of this section.

The secretary of state may not institute a stop order proceeding against an effective registration statement on the basis of conduct or a transaction known to the secretary of state when the registration statement became effective unless the proceeding is instituted within thirty (30) days after the registration statement became effective.

The secretary of state may summarily revoke, deny, postpone, or suspend the effectiveness of a registration statement pending final determination of an administrative proceeding. Upon the issuance of the order, the secretary of state shall promptly notify each person specified in subsection (e) of this section that the order has been issued, the reasons for the revocation, denial, postponement, or suspension, and that within fifteen (15) days after the receipt of a request in a record from the person the matter will be scheduled for a hearing. If a hearing is not requested and none is ordered by the secretary of state, within thirty (30) days after the date of service of the order, the order becomes final. If a hearing is requested or ordered, the secretary of state, after notice of and opportunity for hearing for each person subject to the order, may modify or vacate the order or extend the order until final determination.

A stop order may not be issued under this section without:

Appropriate notice to the applicant or registrant, the issuer, and the person on whose behalf the securities are to be or have been offered;

An opportunity for hearing; and

Findings of fact and conclusions of law in a record in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The secretary of state may modify or vacate a stop order issued under this section if the secretary of state finds that the conditions that caused its issuance have changed or that it is necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What gives rise to right of rescission under state blue sky laws, 52 ALR5th 491.

Persons liable for false registration statement under § 11 of Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77k), 114 ALR Fed 551.

§ 17-4-307.
Waiver
and modification.

The secretary
of state may waive or modify, in whole or in part, any or all of the
requirements of W.S.

17-4-302

,

17-4-303

, and 17-4-304(b) or the requirement
of any information or record in a registration statement or in a periodic
report filed pursuant to W.S. 17-4-305(j).

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.